zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 农/畜牧/渔业专用设备 > 畜牧业 > 卫生与兽医用品: 诊断设备; 外科用品; 疫苗和药物
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Agricultura > Criação de animais > Artigos de saúde e veterinários: Equipamento de diagnóstico; Artigos cirúrgicos; Vacinas e medicamentos
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Nông nghiệp > Chăn nuôi > Vật tư y tế và thú y: Thiết bị chẩn đoán; Vật tư phẫu thuật; Vắc-xin và thuốc
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Agricultură > Creșterea animalelor > Articole pentru sănătate și veterinare: Echipament de diagnosticare; Articole chirurgicale; Vaccinuri și medicamente
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Žemės ūkis > Gyvulininkystė > Sveikatos ir veterinarijos reikmenys: Diagnostinė įranga; Chirurginiai reikmenys; Vakcinos ir vaistai
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Agricultura > Pecuária > Suprimentos de saúde e veterinários: Equipamento de diagnóstico; Suprimentos Cirúrgicos; Vacinas e medicamentos
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Сельское хозяйство > Животноводство > Товары для здоровья и ветеринарии: Диагностическое оборудование; Хирургические расходные материалы; Вакцины и лекарства
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Maatalous > Karjatalous > Terveys- ja eläinlääkintätarvikkeet: Diagnostiikkalaitteet; Kirurgiset tarvikkeet; Rokotteet ja lääkkeet
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Agriculture > Élevage > Fournitures de santé et vétérinaires: Équipement de diagnostic; Fournitures chirurgicales; Vaccins et médicaments
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Γεωργία > Κτηνοτροφία > Υγειονομικά & Κτηνιατρικά Είδη: Διαγνωστικός εξοπλισμός; Χειρουργικές προμήθειες; Εμβόλια & Φάρμακα
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Селско стопанство > Животновъдство > Здравни и ветеринарни консумативи: Диагностично оборудване; Хирургически консумативи; Ваксини и лекарства
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Poľnohospodárstvo > Chov zvierat > Zdravotnícke a veterinárne potreby: Diagnostické prístroje; Chirurgické potreby; Vakcíny a lieky
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Poljoprivreda > Stočarstvo > Zdravstveni i veterinarski pribor: Dijagnostička oprema; Kirurški pribor; Cjepiva i lijekovi
sv: Företag och industri > Jordbruk > Boskapsskötsel > Hälso- och veterinärartiklar: Diagnostisk utrustning; Medicinska förbrukningsartiklar; Vacciner och mediciner
nb: Forretninger og industri > Jordbruk > Husdyrhold > Helse- og veterinærutstyr: Diagnoseutstyr; Kirurgis utstyr; Vaksiner og medisiner
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Rolnictwo > Hodowla zwierząt > Artykuły zdrowotne i weterynaryjne: Sprzęt diagnostyczny; Materiały chirurgiczne; Szczepionki i leki
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > เกษตรกรรม > การเลี้ยงสัตว์ > อุปกรณ์สุขภาพและสัตวแพทย์: อุปกรณ์วินิจฉัย; อุปกรณ์ผ่าตัด; วัคซีนและยา
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Zemědělství > Zootechnika > Zdravotnické a veterinární potřeby: Diagnostické vybavení; Chirurgické potřeby; Vakcíny a léky
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 農業 > 畜産 > 健康・獣医用品: 診断機器; 外科用消耗品; ワクチン・医薬品
da: Erhverv og industri > Landbrug > Husdyrbrug > Sundheds- og veterinærartikler: Diagnostisk udstyr; Kirurgisk tilbehør; Vacciner og medicin
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Tarım > Hayvancılık > Sağlık ve Veterinerlik Malzemeleri: Tanı Ekipmanları; Cerrahi Malzemeler; Aşılar ve İlaçlar
es: Economía e industria > Agricultura > Cría de animales > Suministros de salud y veterinaria: Equipo de diagnóstico; Suministros quirúrgicos; Vacunas y medicamentos
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Landwirtschaft > Viehhaltung > Gesundheits- und Veterinärbedarf: Diagnosegeräte; Chirurgisches Material; Impfstoffe und Medikamente
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 農業 > 畜牧業 > 衛生與獸醫用品: 診斷設備; 手術用品; 疫苗和藥物
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Agrarische sector > Veeteelt > Gezondheids- en veterinaire benodigdheden: Diagnostische apparatuur; Chirurgische benodigdheden; Vaccins en medicijnen
en: Business & Industrial > Agriculture > Animal Husbandry > Health & Veterinary Supplies: Diagnostic Equipment; Surgical Supplies; Vaccines & Medications
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 농업 > 축산업 > 건강 및 수의학 용품: 진단 장비; 수술용품; 백신 및 약물
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Kmetijstvo > Živinoreja > Zdravstveni in veterinarski pripomočki: Diagnostična oprema; Kirurški pripomočki; Cepiva in zdravila
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Mezőgazdaság > Állattenyésztés > Egészségügyi és állatorvosi kellékek: Diagnosztikai berendezések; Orvosi kellékek; Oltások és gyógyszerek
it: Commercio e industria > Agricoltura > Zootecnia > Articoli sanitari e veterinari: Apparecchiature diagnostiche; Materiali chirurgici; Vaccini e farmaci